Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 15 Capital Construction Projects
§ 21-15-116.
School district facility plans; development, review and approval; plan criteria; administrative review; collaborative committee process.

In accordance with rules and regulations of the commission, long range comprehensive school building and facility plans for each school district shall be developed by the department in coordination with the applicable district, which address district wide building and facility needs. The facility plan shall identify building and facility needs aligned with the statewide adequacy standards, actions to remediate building and facility needs including construction, renovation and major building and facility repair and replacement expenditures, and any local enhancements to buildings and facilities beyond statewide adequacy standards. The facility plan shall include a response to each school building and facility need identified on a building–by–building, space–by–space basis. The plan shall also review, and to the extent practical, identify and prioritize nonconstruction alternatives to school building and facility needs such as building closure, modification of school boundaries, modification of school grade configurations and similar approaches. Demolition or use, lease or other methods of disposition of surplus buildings and facilities shall be incorporated as part of the district plan, including the disposition of any existing land owned by the district. The plan shall not include the abandonment or demolition of any school facility or building unless there has first been a public hearing on the issue. The plan shall also specify identified alternative methods of building disposition, proposed allocation of costs incurred or revenues resulting from disposition and allocation of disposition revenues to offset any costs paid by the department. In addition, district facility plans shall include:

Student enrollment projections for a period of five (5) years commencing on the date as determined by the commission of anticipated completion of project construction using commission approved measures and techniques, including a description of the methods used in making projections. The commission may adjust projections computed under this paragraph as necessary to reflect more precise analysis and evaluation of historical, economic, social and other data impacting the community in which the buildings are or are to be located;

A description of proposed new schools or additions and remediations to existing schools necessary to meet building adequacy standards, including:

The grade levels and the total number of pupils that the proposed school or school addition or remediation is intended to serve;

The year in which it is necessary to commence operations of the proposed new school or school addition;

The timeline for the planning and construction of the new school or school addition or remediation.

Projections for new land required for new schools including land purchase, acquisition and site analysis;

Appropriate cost estimates;

A plan for addressing district major building and facility repair and replacement needs as required under W.S. 21-15-109(e);

An inventory of buildings and facilities to be leased by the district during the planning period, either as lessee or lessor, including the purpose for which the leased buildings and facilities are to be used and if any of this leased space will involve any district buildings or facilities included within the statewide school facilities database maintained by the department under W.S. 21-15-123(f)(iv);

Other information required by the department to evaluate each district’s plan.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 93, § 2.

At least once every two (2) years, the commission shall review and approve each plan developed by the department under this section to ensure each plan:

Complies with state adequacy standards;

Reduces building and facility needs in the most efficient and cost effective manner in order to deliver quality educational services;

Considers nonconstruction alternatives;

Provides facilities capable of supporting the provision of the statewide educational program required by law of public schools.

Any school district aggrieved by a decision of the department or the commission under this act may seek review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. In accordance with W.S.

16-3-112

, review of a decision of the department shall be before the commission.

In carrying out this act and in accordance with policies adopted by the commission, the commission or the department shall consult with the affected school districts and shall provide districts the opportunity to informally review facility plans, remedies and projects with the department or the commission before districts pursue administrative review under subsection (e) of this section.

In expending funds appropriated by the legislature for projects submitted by the commission under W.S.

21-15-119

, and commensurate with school district efforts undertaken in facility planning required under subsection (a) of this section, the state construction department shall require school district boards of trustees to incorporate a collaborative committee process, advisory to the board, which assists the school district with planning district remedies for school buildings, ranging from site selection to project planning and design. The collaborative committee process for remedy development may include project stakeholders comprised of students, parents, teachers, principals, district administration, school board of trustee members, representative legislators, at-large members of the community and others. Although advisory to district boards, the collaborative committee shall assist the boards with informing the respective community and in developing community-based input into project development.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2004, ch. 113, § 1; ch. 114, § 1; 2005, ch. 222, § 1; 2006, ch. 42, § 1; 2007, ch. 48, § 1; 2008, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; 2013 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 113, § 1, in the introductory language in (a), rewrote the last full sentence, which formerly read: “Demolition or use, lease or other methods of disposition of commission determined surplus buildings and facilities shall be incorporated as part of the district plan, including identified alternative methods of building disposition and proposed allocation of costs incurred or revenues resulting from disposition or demolition.”

Laws 2004, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, redesignated former (a)(v) as (a)(vii) and added (a)(v) and (a)(vi).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given efect in this section as set out above.

The 2005 amendment,

in the third-to-last sentence in the introductory language in (a), inserted “including the disposition of any existing land owned by the district.”

Laws 2005, ch. 222, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), deleted “over a five (5) year period” and made a similar change, substituted “facility plan” for “plan” in two places, deleted “by the needs assessment” following “inadequacy identified”; substituted “a period of not less than” for “the next” in (i); in (b), in the first sentence, deleted “but not later than July 1, 2003” following “by the commission,” inserted “not later than July 1 of each odd numbered year,” deleted the third sentence concerning the updating of facility plans by districts and the exception, deleted “and plan updates” preceding “shall be in a form”; in (c), deleted “In addition to subsection (b) of this section,” at the beginning, substituted “two (2)” for “five (5)”; in (e), inserted “remedy or project” and made similar changes, deleted “sixty (60) but not more than” preceding “ninety (90) days,” substituted “subject to judicial review under the contested case provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act” for “a final administrative determination subject to judicial review under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act”; and made stylistic and related changes throughout.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) substituted “Unless” for “In accordance with,” inserted “is otherwise” preceding “established by the commission,” inserted “once each year,” following “the commission shall”; added (f).

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 13, § 1, effective March 3, 2008, inserted “in order to deliver quality educational services” in (d)(ii).

Laws 2008, ch. 13, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 93, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2008, in (a), rewrote the first sentence, deleted “shall be in a form and format specified by rule and regulation of the commission and” after “facility plan” in the second sentence, substituted “needs” for “inadequacies” and “need” for “inadequacy”, added the sixth sentence; repealed former (b) and (c) which pertained to scheduling of and review and development of district facility plan; in (d), rewrote the introductory language which read: “Upon receipt, the commission shall review each submitted district facility plan. Commission review shall ensure the plan”, substituted “needs” for “inadequacies”; rewrote (e); made stylistic changes.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “department” for “commission” twice, and deleted “commission determined” preceding “surplus buildings and facilities” in the fifth sentence; in (a)(vi), substituted “department” for “commission” and “21-15-123(f)(iv)” for “21-15-114(a)(vi)”; in (a)(vii), substituted “department” for “commission”; in (d), inserted “At least once every two (2) years” and “review and approve each plan developed by the department under this section to”; in (e), inserted “department or the,” and added the second sentence; and in (f), inserted both references to the department.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(i), substituted “period of five (5) years” for “period of not less than five (5) years,” added “commencing on the date as determined by the commission of anticipated completion of project construction,” and added the last sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (g).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (g) substituted “state construction” for “school facilities” preceding “department.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “practical, identify and prioritize nonconstruction alternatives” for “practical, identify nonconstruction alternatives” in the fourth sentence and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-15-111(a)(viii).

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2006, ch. 42, § 2, provides:

“(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 21-15-116(a) as amended by section 1 of this act, the most current two (2) years of the five (5) year district facility plans submitted on or before July 1, 2005, in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 21-15-116(a) in effect prior to the July 1, 2006, shall be deemed to fulfill requirements of the district facility plans for the biennial period commencing July 1, 2006, and ending June 30, 2008.

“(b) Notwithstanding W.S. 21-15-116(b) in effect prior to July 1, 2006, district five (5) year plans submitted on or before July 1, 2005, shall not be required to be annually updated by each district on or before July 1, 2007.

“(c) Each school district shall on or before July 1, 2007, prepare and submit to the school facilities commission a district facility plan in accordance with W.S.

21-15-116

, as amended by section 1 of this act.”

§ 21-15-117.
Annual evaluation of school buildings and facilities; remediation schedules; needs prioritization; combining facilities; implementation of remedy.

The commission shall annually evaluate the adequacy of school buildings and facilities and prioritize school building and facility needs in accordance with this subsection. The commission shall cause the department, as it deems necessary, to conduct periodic on-site visitations and inspections of school buildings and facilities and acquire other relevant needs assessment data acquired in coordination and cooperation with the districts for purposes of this evaluation and prioritization. The commission shall give due consideration to district facility plans developed under W.S.

21-15-116

in performing this evaluation and prioritization. To conduct the evaluation and prioritization, the commission shall establish two (2) schedules for building and facility remediation on a statewide basis using appropriate scoring systems, as described in paragraphs (i) and (iii) of this subsection. Under each of the two (2) schedules the commission shall prioritize educational building and facility needs that impede the delivery of the prescribed statewide educational program. Additionally, the commission shall establish one (1) consolidated remediation schedule as described in paragraph (vi) of this subsection. The commission shall by rule and regulation establish a process to prioritize all school building and facility needs from the most critical to the least critical with the most critical need prioritized first. Remediation undertaken under these schedules shall over time bring all buildings and facilities to the levels set by the statewide adequacy standards promulgated under W.S. 21-15-115(a). The commission shall annually develop:

One (1) schedule to remedy building condition needs, which shall be based on appropriate criteria and measures for building condition, as established by commission rule and regulation, compiled under the building systems condition reference guide for building condition. The schedule shall be categorized by educational and noneducational building;

Repealed by Laws 2011, Ch. 71, § 2.

One (1) schedule to remedy building capacity needs. The commission shall base the schedule on an analysis of student enrollment changes, performed in accordance with a commission approved enrollment projection methodology, to determine the need for changes in building capacities for compliance with statewide adequacy standards over a five (5) year projection period commencing on the date of anticipated completion of project construction. The commission may adjust projections computed under this paragraph as necessary to reflect more precise analysis and evaluation of historical, economic, social and other data impacting the community in which the building is or is to be located;

and (v) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 131, § 2.

One (1) consolidated remediation schedule of all needs identified under the two (2) schedules developed pursuant to paragraphs (i) and (iii) of this subsection.

The commission shall for each building and facility remedy scheduled under subsection (a) of this section, ensure the adoption of the most cost effective method of remediation of building and facility needs to deliver quality educational services and ensure compliance with the statewide adequacy standards. The commission shall only request capital outlay for a building with capacity needs identified under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section after consideration of all other remedies for that building. For any scheduled remedy for which major building and facility repair and replacement payments under W.S.

21-15-109

are not sufficient to remedy the scheduled need, as determined by the commission, the commission shall determine if the remedy requires capital outlay.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 93, § 2.

In determining the most cost effective method in meeting capital construction needs in order to deliver quality educational services, the commission in consultation with the select committee on school facilities, may recommend consolidating educational facilities within, between or among school districts. The legislature shall approve any consolidation of educational facilities between two (2) or more school districts.

In determining building and facility remedies under subsection (b) of this section, in developing criteria and procedures for site analysis under W.S. 21-15-114(a)(xii) and in approving district facility plans under W.S.

21-15-116

and otherwise administering this act, the commission shall adopt the remedy that is in the best financial and educational interests of the state, taking into consideration the recommendations of the department and the most efficient and cost effective approach in order to deliver quality educational services and address building and facility need. Expenditures from the school capital construction account shall be for necessary and related costs to implement efficient and cost effective building and facility remedies required to deliver quality educational services. In making determinations under this subsection, the commission shall take into consideration the effects of the proposed activity on the local community. The commission shall implement this subsection in carrying out building and facility remedies and shall, giving proper consideration to the prevention of unnecessary delays in proceeding with a remedy, establish a process to work with other political subdivisions of the state in implementing this subsection.

For any building subject to paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, and when prioritizing buildings and facilities remedies pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall consider criteria for building capacity established by commission rule and regulation which include:

A comparison of the existing and projected student population served by each building to square footage guidelines established by the commission under W.S. 21-15-115(a) for that building;

An analysis of the number of classrooms within the building including an examination of the building square footage devoted to classrooms compared to the building total square footage;

An analysis of the building’s square footage per student;

An examination of loading and utilization factors for that building to encourage the efficient use of classrooms with a factor of eighty-five percent (85%) of the instructional area applied to middle and high school level buildings, and a factor of one hundred percent (100%) of the home room instructional area applied to elementary school buildings; and

Total acreage of the site on which the building is situated.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2008, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2013 ch. 5, § 1, effective February 11, 2013; 2013 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 131, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 13, § 1, effective March 3, 2008, inserted “deliver quality educational services and” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (b); inserted “in order to deliver quality educational services” in (c); and added (d).

Laws 2008, ch. 13, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 93, §§ 1, 2 effective July 1, 2008, substituted “developed under W.S.

21-15-116

, the commission shall” for “submitted under W.S.

21-15-116

, the commission shall annually” in the introductory language of (a); deleted “within the next two (2) years for elementary schools, and within the next three (3) years for middle and high schools” at the end of (a)(iii); in (b), substituted “needs” for “inadequacies” in the first sentence, substituted “capital outlay” for “minor capital outlay within the next two (2) years for elementary schools, and within the next three (3) years for middle and high schools” in the last sentence, repealed former (b)(i) which read: “ ‘Minor capital outlay’ involves a total project or remedy expenditure of less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00), excluding major building and facility repair and replacement expenditures under W.S.

21-15-109

”, repealed former (b)(ii) which read: “ ‘Major capital outlay’ involves a total project or remedy expenditure of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) or more, excluding major building and facility repair and replacement expenditures under W.S.

21-15-109

”.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 2 § 2, effective July 1, 2011, inserted “based upon reports provided by the department and” and “the commission shall” in the introductory language of (a);
in (a)(v), inserted “which independently provides full consideration to each of the measures provided in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection”; in (b), substituted “ensure the adoption of” for “determine” in the first sentence; in (d), substituted “approving” for “developing” in the first sentence, and inserted “the recommendations of the department and”; and made stylistic changes.

The second 2011 amendment by ch. 71 §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2011, inserted “a building condition score developed by the commission subject to” in the introductory language of (a); in (a)(i), inserted “and measures” near the beginning, substituted “building condition which incorporate” for “building capacity, building condition,” inserted “specifically taking into consideration appropriate and up-to-date standards for air quality, illumination and appropriateness of the student environment, as” and “and compiled under the building systems condition reference guide, which over time bring statewide buildings and facilities to targeted adequate levels prescribed by the commission”; repealed former (a)(ii) pertaining to measures of building condition, educational suitability, and technology readiness; in (b), inserted the present second sentence; and added (e).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “proceeding” for “preceding” in the last sentence of (d).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 5, § 1, added “with a factor of eighty-five percent (85%) of the instructional area applied to middle and high school level buildings, and a factor of one hundred percent (100%) of the home room instructional area applied to elementary school buildings” in (iv).

Laws 2013, ch 5 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved February 11, 2013.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(iii), deleted “over time” after “capacities” and added the language beginning “over a five (5) year projection period” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as seet out above.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "schedules" for "schedule" in the section heading; rewrote (a), which read, "Through the identification of school building and facility conditions and needs provided by the assessment conducted and maintained under W.S.

21-15-115

, and a comparison of the identified conditions and needs with the established statewide building adequacy standards and the district facility plans developed under W.S.

21-15-116

, the commission shall, based upon reports provided by the department and in coordination and cooperation with the districts, evaluate the adequacy of school buildings and facilities within local school districts. Based upon this evaluation, the commission shall establish a schedule for building and facility remediation. Remediation shall bring all buildings and facilities to conditions such that over time, only routine maintenance is required to maintain building adequacy. The schedule shall identify and prioritize building and facility remedies on a statewide basis, based upon a building condition score developed by the commission subject to the following:"; rewrote (a)(i), which read, "Criteria and measures for building condition which incorporate educational suitability and technology readiness, specifically taking into consideration appropriate and up-to-date standards for air quality, illumination and appropriateness of the student environment, as established by commission rule and regulation and compiled under the building systems condition reference guide, which over time bring statewide buildings and facilities to targeted adequate levels prescribed by the commission, reviewed annually, based upon assessment results and findings, broken down by educational and noneducational building category"; in (a)(iii), added the first sentence, in the second sentence, added "The commission shall base the schedule on an," substituted "performed in accordance with a" for "as based upon" and made a related change; added (a)(vi); substituted "subsection" for "paragraph" in the third sentence of (d); and substituted "remedies" for "based upon condition" in (e).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 131, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(iv), which read, "Priority shall be given to educational buildings and to conditions in those buildings which impede the delivery of the prescribed statewide educational program"; and repealed (a)(v), which read, "A methodology and process for identifying the most critical building and facility needs, which independently provides full consideration to each of the measures provided in paragraphs (i) through (iv) of this subsection."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 207, § 2 provides:

“(a)
The school facilities commission shall obtain an independent audit of all projects and processes included in the prioritization of building and facility needs and the scheduling of building and facility remediation pursuant to W.S.

21-15-117

.
On or before September 1, 2009, the audit findings shall be reported to the select school facilities committee and shall:

“(i)
Provide an accounting of the total costs of each project in its entirety, for all projects scheduled for remediation or otherwise receiving funds from the school capital construction account during the two (2) most recent fiscal years, identifying all project cost subcategories and the derivation of project cost components, reviewing the budgeting, allocation and obligation of funding each project component and identifying resulting balances between allocations and projected costs;

“(ii)
Examine the prioritization and remediation process used by the commission, clearly describing the linkage between prioritization under W.S.

21-15-117

, school district facility plan approval under W.S.

21-15-116

and the budget recommendation forwarded under W.S.

21-15-118

;

“(iii)
Review commission establishment and application of facility guidelines in forwarding project remedies, including the application of cost per square foot guidelines and the linkage to statewide adequacy standards set by the commission under W.S.

21-15-115

;

“(iv)
Examine processes granting exceptions or deviations from established project facility and other cost-related guidelines;

“(v)
Review procedures for identifying local enhancements to commission approved projects and the management practices employed for and accounting of enhancement costs;

“(vi)
Provide recommendations for necessary improvement of processes examined and reviewed under this section;

“(vii)
Based upon audit findings, recommend an ongoing accounting, review and reporting process for use by the commission in reporting to the select school facilities committee, the joint appropriations committee, the governor and the legislature.”

Laws 2009, ch. 207, § 3 provides: “One hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000.00) is appropriated from the school capital construction account created under W.S. 21-15-111(a)(i) to the school facilities commission to obtain and carry out the independent audit required under section 2 of this act.
This appropriation is effective for the period commencing on the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2010.”

Legislative intent. —

Legislature required that the Wyoming School Facilities Commission (SFC) to establish and maintain uniform statewide standards for the adequacy of school buildings and facilities and that the SFC make an annual report regarding all aspects of the school facilities needs, including buildings deemed inadequate, expenditures, progress, and upcoming budgetary needs; under the statutory scheme, the legislature provided for capital construction funding from state wealth without reliance upon local wealth as a source of capital, mandated that facilities be remedied to a point requiring only routine maintenance, and made adequacy of the facilities a function of delivering adequate education programs. The legislature has acted to increase the speed of repair or replacement and continues to appropriate large sums; that continued aggressive legislative oversight over capital construction was obtaining results as part of a constitutional statutory scheme to eliminate wealth-based disparities in the state school system.
Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 2008 WY 2, 181 P.3d 43,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2008).

§ 21-15-118.
Building and facility construction and renovation projects.

Upon determination by the commission following review under W.S.

21-15-117

, and appropriation by the legislature in accordance with W.S.

21-15-119

, the department shall proceed with projects as follows:

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 93, § 2.

If a capital outlay remedy:

With the assistance of the involved school district, develop and approve the necessary schematic design documents;

Conduct a value engineering analysis of the project;

Perform an energy efficiency assessment of the project;

Conduct a safety and security assessment of the project;

Enforce the requirements under subparagraphs (a)(ii)(B) through (D) of this section and may waive any of these requirements if determined not necessary or if provided within any one (1) of the other requirements specified under this paragraph.

If required, the department shall provide for temporary space for any scheduled building remedy by means of portable buildings creating capacity or by other means available to the department.

The projects shall be managed and all necessary contracts related to the projects shall proceed in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 9-2-3004(c)(ii) and commission rules and regulations promulgated and adopted pursuant to W.S. 21-15-114(a)(xv).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2007, ch. 48, § 1; 2008, ch. 93, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, § 2, effective October 1, 2020.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(ii)(A) inserted “and approve” preceding “the necessary schematic”; in (a)(ii)(E) substituted “Enforce” for “Waive any of” and inserted “and may waive any of these requirements” preceding “if determined not necessary.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “projects as follows” for “projects authorized and approved by the legislature as follows” in the introductory language of (a); repealed former (a)(i) which read: “If a minor capital outlay remedy, initiate directly and in cooperation with a school district, necessary action to complete the remedy”, substituted “a capital” for “a major capital” in (a)(ii) and made related changes; substituted “provide for” for “assist the local school district to provide” in (b); substituted “W.S. 21-15-114(a)(xv)” for “W.S. 21-15-114(a)(xiv)” in (c).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “department” for “commission” in the introductory language of (a) and twice in (b).

The 2020 amendment,

effective October 1, 2020, in (c) substituted “with rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 9-2-3004(c)(ii) and commission rules” for “with commission rules.”

§ 21-15-119.
Commission budget and funding recommendations.

Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1012

, the commission shall annually, not later than September 1, develop and submit a recommended budget for projects and school capital construction financing to the governor, through the state budget department and to the select committee on school facilities. The department shall prepare and provide information as requested by the commission. The commission shall include with its recommended budget to the select committee the prioritized schedules of projects specified in W.S.

21-15-117

including the amounts allocated to each project and the annual building status report specified under W.S.

21-15-121

. The recommended budget submitted by the commission shall include:

The estimated costs and proposed funding amounts for all projects determined under W.S.

21-15-117

and

21-15-118

and proposed for that budget period, together with estimated expenditures for major building and facility repair and replacement program payments under W.S.

21-15-109

for the same budget period;

Financing alternatives for funding the recommended budget, which uses any combination of the following financing alternatives:

Direct payment from the school capital construction account;

Proceeds from state revenue bonds issued under W.S.

21-15-108

;

Real property leasing under W.S.

21-15-112

. Any payments for real property leasing shall be made from the school capital construction account subject to W.S.

21-15-112

. For the purpose of this section, real property leasing includes payments sufficient for the exercise of a purchase option under the lease.

In odd-numbered years, the commission’s recommendation on September 1 shall be for expenditures during the two (2) succeeding fiscal years. The recommendation for the second year shall be based on estimates of expenditures and payments. In even-numbered years, the commission’s recommendation on September 1 shall be for expenditures during the succeeding fiscal year. As it determines to be necessary in any year, the commission’s recommendation on September 1 may contain a recommendation for revised expenditures during the current fiscal year.

The department may enter into agreements under which the department may make payments on behalf of a school district with respect to the district’s lease of school facilities under W.S.

21-15-112

. The department may also enter into any agreement with a nonprofit corporation or other entity necessary to ensure that a district can lease facilities under W.S.

21-15-112

.

Budgets submitted by the commission under subsection (a) of this section and recommended by the select committee on school facilities under W.S.

28-11-301

shall be attached to specified projects for the applicable budget period, which projects shall be referred to as planning and design phase projects and construction phase projects. With the approval of the governor, the department may transfer up to fifteen percent (15%) of the total funds appropriated between project phases. Any modification of appropriation expenditures between project phases shall be reported to the select committee in accordance with W.S.

28-11-301

(c)(iv). Additionally, the commission may for any budget period specify amounts within its budget which are recommended to cover inflation, unanticipated costs, off-site infrastructure costs and other such contingency or special project costs provided the additional costs are reported and approved in accordance with W.S. 28-11-301(c)(iv).

Amounts appropriated by the legislature shall not be construed to be an entitlement or guaranteed amount and shall be expended by the department in accordance with facility design standards and guidelines to ensure adequate, efficient and cost effective school buildings and facilities as required by W.S. 21-15-114(a)(vii). The commission shall adopt facility design standards and guidelines that are sufficiently specific to ensure that all projects constructed using state funds, excluding major building and facility repair and replacement projects, are subject to value engineering and are reasonably uniform across the state. In establishing the facility design standards and guidelines, the commission shall incorporate reasonable input and participation for conforming an aesthetic design within the community.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 1; 2009, ch. 207, § 1; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2014 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory paragraph of (a), in the first sentence, substituted “not later than September 1” for “not later than November 1, and after review by and in conjunction with the select committee on school facilities” and added “and to the select committee on school facilities” at the end, and added the second sentence; in (a)(i), substituted “The estimated costs and proposed funding amounts” for “The amount of funding” and inserted “21-15-117 and”; and added (c).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “develop” for “prepare” in the first sentence, and added the present second sentence; and substituted “department” for “commission” throughout (b) and (c).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “September” for “November” three times in (a)(iii).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “real property” for “capital” three times in (a)(ii)(C).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in the first sentence of (a), added "state" following "through the," deleted "division of the" preceding "department" and "of administration and information" preceding "and to the."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (a), deleted "comprehensive assessment specified in W.S. 21-15-115(b), the" following "committee the" and substituted "schedules" for "list"; added "on school facilities" in the first sentence of (c); added the (d) designation; in current (d), added "design standards and" in the first sentence and the second sentence.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.